Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1499.05
Official or employee; abuse of official position.

An official or employee shall not abuse his or her official position. Abuse of an official position includes, but is not limited to, employing an immediate family member (1) who is not qualified for and able to perform the duties of the position, (2) for any unreasonably high salary, or (3) who is not required to perform the duties of the position.

Laws 2001, LB 242, § 17.